North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-06 Department of Human Services
50-06-43.2.
Commission on juvenile justice — Reports. [Effective September 1, 2022 – Repealed effective until July 2, 2025 [Effective September 1, 2022; Effective until July 2, 2025]

The commission on juvenile justice is composed of:

Three members of the house of representatives, two of whom must be selected by the majority leader of the house of representatives and one of whom must be selected by the minority leader of the house of representatives;

Three members of the senate, two of whom must be selected by the majority leader of the senate and one of whom must be selected by the minority leader of the senate;

The governor, or the governor’s designee;

The superintendent of public instruction, or the superintendent’s designee;

The executive director of the department, or the executive director’s designee;

The director of the department of corrections and rehabilitation’s division of juvenile services, or the director’s designee;

The executive director of the Indian affairs commission, or the executive director’s designee;

A director of juvenile court services, appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court;

A representative from the commission on legal counsel for indigents; and

The following members appointed by the governor:

A state’s attorney;

A representative of a children’s advocacy center; and

A representative of local law enforcement.

The chairman of the legislative management shall designate one of the members of the commission to serve as the presiding officer. The governor’s appointees serve at the pleasure of the governor. Excluding ex officio members, the term of a commission member is two years.

The commission shall meet at least four times per year at the times and locations designated by the presiding officer. The office of the governor shall provide staffing for the commission.

The commission shall:

Review chapters 27-20.1, 27-20.2, 27-20.3, and 27-20.4;

Gather information concerning issues of child welfare, including education, abuse, and neglect;

Receive reports and testimony from individuals, state and local agencies, community-based organizations, and other public and private organizations, in furtherance of the commission’s duties;

Advise effective intervention, resources, and services for children;

Report to the children’s cabinet; and

Annually submit to the governor and the legislative management a report with the commission’s findings and recommendations which may include a legislative strategy to implement the recommendations.

A member of the commission who is not a state employee is entitled to reimbursement for mileage and expenses as provided by law for state officers and employees to be paid by the department of corrections and rehabilitation. A state employee who is a member of the commission is entitled to receive that employee’s regular salary and is entitled to reimbursement for mileage and expenses to be paid by the employing agency. A member of the commission who is a member of the legislative assembly is entitled to receive per diem compensation at the rate provided under section 54-35-10 for each day performing official duties of the commission. The legislative council shall pay the per diem compensation and reimbursement for travel and expenses as provided by law for any member of the commission who is a member of the legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 394, § 4, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 245, § 37, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 363, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 405, eff September 1, 2022; Repealed by 2021, ch. 363, § 2, eff August 1, 2025.; 2021, ch. 363, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

50-06-43.2.
Commission on juvenile justice — Reports.
[Repealed effective August 1, 2025]

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 394, § 4, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 245, § 37, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 363, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 405, eff September 1, 2022; Repealed by 2021, ch. 363, § 2, eff August 1, 2025.; 2021, ch. 363, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

50-06-44.
Alcohol and drug education program — Rules — Fees.

The department shall adopt rules for an evidence-based alcohol and drug education program for individuals under the age of twenty-one who violate section 5-01-08. The rules must allow for the program provider to charge a fee to a participant in the program.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 333, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.